California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(3) Failure to file a written request to appear and be heard within 15 days after the notice was mailed will result in waiver of the right to appear and be heard.

(c) The governing body, or a committee of not less than 11 members thereof designated by the governing body if the governing body has more than 40 members, shall hold a hearing at which all persons described in subdivision (a) who filed a written request within the time specified in the notice may appear and be heard on the matters referred to in Section 1240.030. Such a committee shall be reasonably representative of the various
geographical areas within the public entity’s jurisdiction. The governing body need not give an opportunity to appear and be heard to any person who fails to so file a written request within the time specified in the notice. If a committee is designated by the governing body pursuant to this subdivision to hold the hearing, the committee, subsequent to the hearing, shall provide the governing body and any person described in subdivision (a) who has appeared before the committee with a written summary of the hearing and a written recommendation as to whether to adopt the resolution of necessity. Any person described in subdivision (a) who has appeared before the committee shall also be given an opportunity to appear and be heard before the governing body on the matters referred to in Section 1240.030.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the governing body may satisfy the requirements of this section through any other procedure that has given
each person described in subdivision (a) reasonable written personal notice and a reasonable opportunity to appear and be heard on the matters referred to in Section 1240.030.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 358, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.240.

Unless a greater vote is required by statute, charter, or ordinance, the resolution shall be adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the governing body of the public entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.245.

(a) Property acquired by a public entity by any means set forth in subdivision (e) that is subject to a resolution of necessity adopted pursuant to this article shall only be used for the public use stated in the resolution unless the governing body of the public entity adopts a resolution authorizing a different use of the property by a vote of at least two-thirds of all members of the governing body of the public entity, or a greater vote as required by statute, charter, or ordinance. The resolution shall contain all of the
following:

(1) A general statement of the new public use that is proposed for the property and a reference to the statute that would have authorized the public entity to acquire the property by eminent domain for that use.

(2) A description of the general location and extent of the property proposed to be used for the new use, with sufficient detail for reasonable identification.

(3) A declaration that the governing body has found and determined each of the following:

(A) The public interest and necessity require the proposed use.

(B) The proposed use is planned and located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest public good and least private injury.

(C) The property described in the resolution is necessary for the proposed use.

(b) Property acquired by a public entity by any means set forth in subdivision (e) that is subject to a resolution of necessity pursuant to this article, and is not used for the public use stated in the resolution of necessity within 10 years of the adoption of the resolution of necessity, shall be sold in accordance with the terms of subdivisions (f) and (g), unless the governing body adopts a resolution according to the terms of subdivision (a) or a resolution according to the terms of this subdivision reauthorizing the existing stated public use of the property by a vote of at least two-thirds of all members of the governing body of the public entity or a greater vote as required by statute, charter, or ordinance. A reauthorization resolution under this subdivision shall contain all of the
following:

(1) A general statement of the public use that is proposed to be reauthorized for the property and a reference to the statute that authorized the public entity to acquire the property by eminent domain for that use.

(2) A description of the general location and extent of the property proposed to be used for the public use, but not yet in use for the public use, with sufficient detail for reasonable identification.

(3) A declaration that the governing body has found and determined each of the following:

(A) The public interest and necessity require the proposed use.

(B) The proposed use is planned and located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest public
good and least private injury.

(C) The property described in the resolution is necessary for the proposed use.

(c) In addition to any notice required by law, the notice required for a new or reauthorization resolution sought pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall comply with Section 1245.235 and shall be sent to each person who was given notice required by Section 1245.235 in connection with the original acquisition of the property by the public entity.

(d) Judicial review of an action pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) may be obtained by a person who had an interest in the property described in the resolution at the time that the property was acquired by the public entity, and shall be governed by Section 1085.

(e) The following property acquisitions
are subject to the requirements of this section:

(1) Any acquisition by a public entity pursuant to eminent domain.

(2) Any acquisition by a public entity following adoption of a resolution of necessity pursuant to this article for the property.

(3) Any acquisition by a public entity prior to the adoption of a resolution of necessity pursuant to this article for the property, but subsequent to a written notice that the public entity may take the property by eminent domain.

(f) If the public entity fails to adopt either a new resolution pursuant to subdivision (a) or a reauthorization resolution pursuant to subdivision (b), as required by this section, and that property was not used for the public use stated in a resolution of necessity adopted pursuant
to this article or a resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) between the time of its acquisition and the time of the public entity’s failure to adopt a resolution pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), the public entity shall offer the person or persons from whom the property was acquired the right of first refusal to purchase the property pursuant to this section, as follows:

(1) At the present market value, as determined by independent licensed appraisers.

(2) For property that was a single-family residence at the time of acquisition, at an affordable price, which price shall not be greater than the price paid by the agency for the original acquisition, adjusted for inflation, and shall not be greater than fair market value, if the following requirements are met:

(A) The person or persons from whom the
property was acquired certify their income to the public entity as persons or families of low or moderate income.

(B) If the single-family residence is offered at a price that is less than fair market value, the public entity may verify the certifications of income in accordance with procedures used for verification of incomes of purchasers and occupants of housing financed by the California Housing Finance Agency.

(C) If the single-family residence is offered at a price that is less than fair market value, the public entity shall impose terms, conditions, and restrictions to ensure that the residence will either:

(i) Remain owner-occupied by the person or persons from whom the property was acquired for at least five years.

(ii) Remain available to
persons or families of low or moderate income and households with incomes no greater than the incomes of the present occupants in proportion to the area median income for the longest feasible time, but for not less than 55 years for rental units and 45 years for home ownership units.

(D) The Department of Housing and Community Development shall provide to the public entity recommendations of standards and criteria for those prices, terms, conditions, and restrictions.

(g) If after a diligent effort the public entity is unable to locate the person from whom the property was acquired, if the person from whom the property was acquired does not choose to purchase the property as provided in subdivision (f), or if the public entity fails to adopt a resolution as required pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) but is not required to offer a right of first refusal pursuant to subdivision
(f), the public entity shall sell the property as surplus property pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(h) If residential property acquired by a public entity by any means set forth in subdivision (e) is sold as surplus property pursuant to subdivision (g), and that property was not used for the public use stated in a resolution of necessity adopted pursuant to this article or a resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) between the time of its acquisition and the time of its sale as surplus property, the public entity shall pay to the person or persons from whom the public entity acquired the property the sum of any financial gain between the original acquisition price, adjusted for inflation, and the final sale price.

(i) Upon completion of any acquisition described in
subdivision (e) or upon the adoption of a resolution of necessity pursuant to this section, whichever is later, the public entity shall give written notice to the person or persons from whom the property was acquired as described in subdivision (e) stating that the notice, right of first refusal, and return of financial gain rights discussed in this section may accrue.

(j) At least 60 days before selling the property pursuant to subdivision (g), the public entity shall make a diligent effort to locate the person from whom the property was acquired. At any time before the proposed sale, the person from whom the property was acquired may exercise the rights provided by this section. As used in this section, “diligent effort” means that the public entity has done all of the following:

(1) Mailed the notice of the proposed sale by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last
known address of the person from whom the property was acquired.

(2) Mailed the notice of the proposed sale by certified mail, return receipt requested, to each person with the same name as the person from whom the property was acquired at any other address on the last equalized assessment roll.

(3) Published the notice of the proposed sale pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in at least one newspaper of general circulation within the city or county in which the property is located.

(4) Posted the notice of the proposed sale in at least three public places within the city or county in which the property is located.

(5) Posted the notice of the proposed sale on the property proposed to be sold.

(k) For purposes of this section, “adjusted for inflation” means the original acquisition price increased to reflect the proportional increase in the Consumer Price Index for all items for the State of California, as determined by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the period from the date of acquisition to the date the property is offered for sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.250.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by statute, a resolution of necessity adopted by the governing body of the public entity pursuant to this article conclusively establishes the matters referred to in Section 1240.030.

(b) If the taking is by a local public entity, other than a sanitary district exercising the powers of a county water district pursuant to Section 6512.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and the property is electric, gas, or water public utility property, the
resolution of necessity creates a rebuttable presumption that the matters referred to in Section 1240.030 are true. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(c) If the taking is by a local public entity and the property described in the resolution is not located entirely within the boundaries of the local public entity, the resolution of necessity creates a presumption that the matters referred to in Section 1240.030 are true. This presumption is a presumption affecting the burden of producing evidence.

(d) For the purposes of subdivision (b), a taking by the State Reclamation Board for the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District is not a taking by a local public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 812, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.255.

(a) A person having an interest in the property described in a resolution of necessity adopted by the governing body of the public entity pursuant to this article may obtain judicial review of the validity of the resolution: 

(1) Before the commencement of the eminent domain proceeding, by petition for a writ of mandate pursuant to Section 1085. The court having jurisdiction of the writ of mandate action, upon motion of any party, shall order the writ of mandate action dismissed without prejudice upon commencement of the eminent domain proceeding unless the court determines that
dismissal will not be in the interest of justice.

(2) After the commencement of the eminent domain proceeding, by objection to the right to take pursuant to this title.

(b) A resolution of necessity does not have the effect prescribed in Section 1245.250 to the extent that its adoption or contents were influenced or affected by gross abuse of discretion by the governing body.

(c) Nothing in this section precludes a public entity from rescinding a resolution of necessity and adopting a new resolution as to the same property subject, after the commencement of an eminent domain proceeding, to the same consequences as a conditional dismissal of the proceeding under Section 1260.120.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 286.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.260.

(a) If a public entity has adopted a resolution of necessity but has not commenced an eminent domain proceeding to acquire the property within six months after the date of adoption of the resolution, or has commenced such proceeding but has not within six months after the commencement of such proceeding attempted diligently to serve the complaint and the summons relating to such proceeding, the property owner may, by an action in inverse condemnation, do either or both of the following:

(1) Require the public entity to take the property and pay compensation therefor.

(2) Recover damages from the public entity for any interference with the possession and use of the property resulting from adoption of the resolution.

Service by mail pursuant to Section 415.30 shall constitute a diligent attempt at service within the meaning of this section.

(b) No claim need be presented against a public entity under Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code as a prerequisite to commencement or maintenance of an action under subdivision (a), but any such action shall be commenced within one year and six months after the date the public entity adopted the resolution of necessity.

(c) A public entity may commence an eminent domain proceeding or rescind a resolution of necessity as a matter of right at any time before
the property owner commences an action under this section. If the public entity commences an eminent domain proceeding or rescinds the resolution of necessity before the property owner commences an action under this section, the property owner may not thereafter bring an action under this section.

(d) After a property owner has commenced an action under this section, the public entity may rescind the resolution of necessity and abandon the taking of the property only under the same circumstances and subject to the same conditions and consequences as abandonment of an eminent domain proceeding.

(e) Commencement of an action under this section does not affect any authority a public entity may have to commence an eminent domain proceeding, take possession of the property pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1255.410) of Chapter 6, or abandon the eminent domain
proceeding.

(f) In lieu of bringing an action under subdivision (a) or if the limitations period provided in subdivision (b) has run, the property owner may obtain a writ of mandate to compel the public entity, within such time as the court deems appropriate, to rescind the resolution of necessity or to commence an eminent domain proceeding to acquire the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 411.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.270.

(a) A resolution of necessity does not meet the requirements of this article if the defendant establishes by a preponderance of the evidence both of the following:

(1) A member of the governing body who voted in favor of the resolution received or agreed to receive a bribe, as defined in Section 7 of the Penal
 Code, involving adoption of the resolution.

(2) But for the conduct described in paragraph (1), the resolution would not otherwise have been adopted.

(b) Where there has been a prior criminal prosecution of the member for the conduct described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), proof of conviction shall be conclusive evidence that the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is satisfied, and proof of acquittal or other dismissal of the prosecution shall be conclusive evidence that the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is not satisfied. Where there is a pending criminal prosecution of the member for the conduct described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the court may take such action as is just under the circumstances of the case.

(c) Nothing in
 this section precludes a public entity from rescinding a resolution of necessity and adopting a new resolution as to the same property, subject to the same consequences as a conditional dismissal of the proceeding under Section 1260.120.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 1.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Resolution Consenting to Eminent Domain Proceeding by Quasi-Public Entity [1245.310. - 1245.390.]

1245.310.

As used in this article, “legislative body” means both of the following:

(a) The legislative body of each city within whose boundaries property sought to be taken by the quasi-public entity by eminent domain is located.

(b) If property sought to be taken by the quasi-public entity is not located within city boundaries, the legislative body of each county within whose boundaries such property is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.320.

As used in this article, “quasi-public entity” means:

(a) An educational institution of collegiate grade not conducted for profit that seeks to take property by eminent domain under Section 94500 of the Education Code.

(b) A nonprofit hospital that seeks to take property by eminent domain under Section 1260 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) A cemetery authority
that seeks to take property by eminent domain under Section 8501 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) A limited-dividend housing corporation that seeks to take property by eminent domain under Section 34874 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) A land-chest corporation that seeks to take property by eminent domain under former Section 35167 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) A mutual water company that seeks to take property by eminent domain under Section 2729 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 67.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.325.

Where an owner of real property seeks to acquire an appurtenant easement by eminent domain pursuant to Section 1001 of the Civil Code:

(a) The person seeking to exercise the power of eminent domain shall be deemed to be a “quasi-public entity” for the purposes of this article.

(b) In lieu of the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 1245.340, the resolution required by this article shall contain a declaration that the legislative body has found and determined each of the following:

(1) There is a great necessity for the taking.

(2) The location of the easement affords the most reasonable service to the property to which it is appurtenant, consistent with the least damage to the burdened property.

(3) The hardship to the owner of the appurtenant property, if the taking is not permitted, clearly outweighs any hardship to the owner of the burdened property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 994.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.326.

Where an owner of real property seeks to acquire by eminent domain a temporary right of entry pursuant to Section 1002 of the Civil Code:

(a) The person seeking to exercise the power of eminent domain shall be deemed to be a “quasi-public entity” for the purposes of this article.

(b) In lieu of the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 1245.340, the resolution required by this article shall contain a declaration that the legislative body has found and determined that each of the conditions required by Section 1002 of
the Civil Code appears to exist.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1239, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.330.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a quasi-public entity may not commence an eminent domain proceeding to acquire any property until the legislative body has adopted a resolution consenting to the acquisition of such property by eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.340.

The resolution required by this article shall contain all of the following:

(a) A general statement of the public use for which the property is to be taken and a reference to the statute that authorizes the quasi-public entity to acquire the property by eminent domain.

(b) A description of the general location and extent of the property to be taken, with sufficient detail for reasonable identification.

(c) A declaration that the legislative body has found and determined each of
the following:

(1) The public interest and necessity require the proposed project.

(2) The proposed project is planned or located in the manner that will be most compatible with the greatest good and least private injury.

(3) The property described in the resolution is necessary for the proposed project.

(4) The hardship to the quasi-public entity if the acquisition of the property by eminent domain is not permitted outweighs any hardship to the owners of such property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.350.

(a) The legislative body may refuse to consent to the acquisition with or without a hearing, but it may adopt the resolution required by this article only after the legislative body has held a hearing at which persons whose property is to be acquired by eminent domain have had a reasonable opportunity to appear and be heard.

(b) Notice of the hearing shall be sent by first-class mail to each person whose property is to be acquired by eminent domain if the name and address of the person appears on the last equalized county assessment roll (including the roll of state-assessed
property). The notice shall state the time, place, and subject of the hearing and shall be mailed at least 15 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.360.

The resolution required by this article shall be adopted by a vote of two-thirds of all the members of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.370.

The legislative body may require that the quasi-public entity pay all of the costs reasonably incurred by the legislative body under this article. The legislative body may require that such costs be secured by payment or deposit or other satisfactory security in advance of any action by the legislative body under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.380.

The requirement of this article is in addition to any other requirements imposed by law. Nothing in this article relieves the quasi-public entity from satisfying the requirements of Section 1240.030 or any other requirements imposed by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1245.390.

The adoption of a resolution pursuant to this article does not make the city or county liable for any damages caused by the acquisition of the property or by the project for which it is acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Commencement of Proceeding [1250.010. - 1250.430.]



  ARTICLE 1. Jurisdiction and Venue [1250.010. - 1250.040.]

1250.010.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 1230.060 and in Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1273.010), all eminent domain proceedings shall be commenced and prosecuted in the superior court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.020.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the proceeding shall be commenced in the county in which the property sought to be taken is located.

(b) When property sought to be taken is situated in more than one county, the plaintiff may commence the proceeding in any one of such counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.030.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the county in which the proceeding is commenced pursuant to Section 1250.020 is the proper county for trial of the proceeding.

(b) Where the court changes the place of trial pursuant to Section 1250.040, the county to which the proceeding is transferred is the proper county for trial of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.040.

The provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure for the change of place of trial of actions apply to eminent domain proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Commencement of Proceeding Generally [1250.110. - 1250.150.]

1250.110.

An eminent domain proceeding is commenced by filing a complaint with the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.120.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the form and contents of the summons shall be as in civil actions generally.

(b) Where process is served by publication, in addition to the summons, the publication shall describe the property sought to be taken in a manner reasonably calculated to give persons with an interest in the property actual notice of the pending proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.125.

(a) Where summons is served by publication, the publication may name only the defendants to be served thereby and describe only the property in which the defendants to be served thereby have or claim interests.

(b) Judgment based on failure to appear and answer following service under this section shall be conclusive against the defendants named in respect only to property described in the publication.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a defendant who did not receive the offer required by Section
7267.2 of the Government Code because the owner could not be located with reasonable diligence, who was served by publication, and who failed to appear, may contest the amount of compensation within one year of the judgment and for good cause shown, whereupon that issue shall be litigated according to the provisions of this title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1079, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.130.

Where the court orders service by publication, it shall also order the plaintiff (1) to post a copy of the summons and complaint on the property sought to be taken and (2), if not already recorded, to record a notice of the pendency of the proceeding in the manner provided by Section 1250.150. Such posting and recording shall be done not later than 10 days after the date the order is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.140.

Where the state is a defendant, the summons and the complaint shall be served on the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.150.

The plaintiff, at the time of the commencement of the proceeding, shall record a notice of the pendency of the proceeding in the office of the county recorder of any county in which property described in the complaint is located. A copy of the notice shall be served with the summons and complaint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 78, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Parties; Joinder of Property [1250.210. - 1250.250.]

1250.210.

Each person seeking to take property by eminent domain shall be named as a plaintiff.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.220.

(a) The plaintiff shall name as defendants, by their real names, those persons who appear of record or are known by the plaintiff to have or claim an interest in the property described in the complaint.

(b) If a person described in subdivision (a) is dead and the plaintiff knows of a duly qualified and acting personal representative of the estate of such person, the plaintiff shall name such personal representative as a defendant. If a person described in subdivision (a) is dead or is believed by the plaintiff to be dead and if plaintiff knows of no duly qualified and acting personal
representative of the estate of such person and states these facts in an affidavit filed with the complaint, plaintiff may name as defendants “the heirs and devisees of ____ (naming such deceased person), deceased, and all persons claiming by, through, or under said decedent,“ naming them in that manner and, where it is stated in the affidavit that such person is believed by the plaintiff to be dead, such person also may be named as a defendant.

(c) In addition to those persons described in subdivision (a), the plaintiff may name as defendants “all persons unknown claiming an interest in the property,” naming them in that manner.

(d) A judgment rendered in a proceeding under this title is binding and conclusive upon all persons named as defendants as provided in this section and properly served.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.230.

Any person who claims a legal or equitable interest in the property described in the complaint may appear in the proceeding. Whether or not such person is named as a defendant in the complaint, he shall appear as a defendant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.240.

The plaintiff may join in one complaint all property located within the same county which is sought to be acquired for the same project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.250.

(a) If the only interest of the county or other taxing agency in the property described in the complaint is a lien for ad valorem taxes, the county or other taxing agency need not be named as a defendant.

(b) The holder of a lien that secures a special assessment or a bond representing the special assessment shall be named as a defendant, regardless of the nature of the special assessment and the manner of collection of the special assessment. The holder of the lien may, instead of an answer, certify to the court within 30 days after service of the summons and
complaint on the holder all of the following information:

(1) A complete description of the lien.

(2) A description of the property encumbered by the lien.

(3) The amount remaining due on the lien as of the date of the certificate.

(4) The date upon which each installment payable on the lien is due and the amount of each installment.

(c) A copy of the certification shall be sent by first-class mail to all parties to the proceeding at the time it is provided to the court. The filing of the certification or answer shall be considered as a general appearance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Pleadings [1250.310. - 1250.345.]

1250.310.

The complaint shall contain all of the following:

(a) The names of all plaintiffs and defendants.

(b) A description of the property sought to be taken. The description may, but is not required to, indicate the nature or extent of the interest of the defendant in the property.

(c) If the plaintiff claims an interest in the property sought to be taken, the nature and extent of such interest.

(d) A statement of the
right of the plaintiff to take by eminent domain the property described in the complaint. The statement shall include:

(1) A general statement of the public use for which the property is to be taken.

(2) An allegation of the necessity for the taking as required by Section 1240.030; where the plaintiff is a public entity, a reference to its resolution of necessity; where the plaintiff is a quasi-public entity within the meaning of Section 1245.320, a reference to the resolution adopted pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1245.310) of Chapter 4; where the plaintiff is a nonprofit hospital, a reference to the certificate required by Section 1260 of the Health and Safety Code; where the plaintiff is a public utility and relies on a certification of the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission or a requirement of that commission that development rights
be acquired, a reference to such certification or requirement.

(3) A reference to the statute that authorizes the plaintiff to acquire the property by eminent domain. Specification of the statutory authority may be in the alternative and may be inconsistent.

(e) A map or diagram portraying as far as practicable the property described in the complaint and showing its location in relation to the project for which it is to be taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.320.

(a) The answer shall include a statement of the nature and extent of the interest the defendant claims in the property described in the complaint.

(b) If the defendant seeks compensation provided in Article 6 (commencing with Section 1263.510) (goodwill) of Chapter 9, the answer shall include a statement that the defendant claims compensation under Section 1263.510, but the answer need not specify the amount of that compensation.

(c) If the defendant seeks compensation as provided in Article 1 (commencing with Section 1245.010) of Chapter 4, the answer shall include a statement that the defendant claims compensation under Section 1245.060, but need not
 specify the amount of that compensation.

(d) If the defendant seeks compensation for losses caused by the plaintiff’s unreasonable conduct prior to commencing the eminent domain proceeding, the answer shall include a statement that the defendant claims compensation for that loss, but need not specify the amount of the compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 401, Sec. 5.   (AB 1578)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.325.

(a) A defendant may file a disclaimer at any time, whether or not he is in default, and the disclaimer supersedes an answer previously filed by the defendant. The disclaimer need not be in any particular form. It shall contain a statement that the defendant claims no interest in the property or in the compensation that may be awarded. Notwithstanding Section 1250.330, the disclaimer shall be signed by the defendant.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a defendant who has filed a disclaimer has no right to participate in further proceedings or to share in the compensation awarded.

(c) The court may implement the disclaimer by appropriate orders including, where justified, awarding costs and litigation expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.330.

Where a party is represented by an attorney, his pleading need not be verified but shall be signed by the attorney for the party. The signature of the attorney constitutes a certificate by him that he has read the pleading and that to the best of his knowledge, information, and belief there is ground to support it. If the pleading is not signed or is signed with intent to defeat the purposes of this section, it may be stricken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.340.

(a) Subject to subdivisions (b) and (c), the court may allow upon such terms and conditions as may be just an amendment or supplement to any pleading. In the case of an amendment or supplement to the complaint, such terms and conditions may include a change in the applicable date of valuation for the proceeding and an award of costs and litigation expenses which would not have been incurred had the proceeding as originally commenced been the same as the proceeding following such amendment or supplement.

(b) A public entity may add to the property sought to be taken only if it has
adopted a resolution of necessity that satisfies the requirements of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1245.210) of Chapter 4 for the property to be added.

(c) Property previously sought to be taken may be deleted from the complaint only if the plaintiff has followed the procedure for partial abandonment of the proceeding as to that property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.345.

Subject to the power of the court to permit an amendment of the answer, if the defendant fails to object to the complaint, either by demurrer or answer, he is deemed to have waived the objection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Objections to Right to Take [1250.350. - 1250.370.]

1250.350.

A defendant may object to the plaintiff’s right to take, by demurrer or answer as provided in Section 430.30, on any ground authorized by Section 1250.360 or Section 1250.370. The demurrer or answer shall state the specific ground upon which the objection is taken and, if the objection is taken by answer, the specific facts upon which the objection is based. An objection may be taken on more than one ground, and the grounds may be inconsistent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1275.)
-------------------------------------------

1250.360.
